District of Columbia statutes.
29-601.01

Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Uniform Partnership Act of 2010”.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 1202 of the Uniform Partnership Act (1997 Act).